test.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>             ! Noun
%<post%>          ! Postposition
%<cmp%>           ! Compound
%<pl%>            ! Plural

%+
%>

LEXICON Root

NominalStems ;

LEXICON N-AGG 

# ;

LEXICON CASES 

%+നിന്ന്%<post%>:നിന്ന് # ; ! "from" ! "nīnn"

LEXICON NUMBER

CASES ; 
%<pl%>:ങ്ങള്‍  CASES ; ! "ṅṅaḷ‍"

LEXICON N1 

%<n%>: NUMBER  ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+: NominalStems ; 

LEXICON NominalStems

മഴക്കാലം:മഴക്കാലം N1 ; ! "rainy season" ! "maḻakkālaṁ"
മേഘം:മേഘം  N1 ; ! "cloud" ! "mēghaṁ"
